Massachusetts, session 194th, H1681.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 39 of chapter 148 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after the fourth paragraph the following paragraph:- 
Whoever shall use or explode or cause to explode any fireworks in violation of this 
section in an area located in a census tract with a population density of 1,000 or more persons per 
square mile shall be punished by a fine of not less than $200 and not more than $500, or by 
imprisonment for not more than 6 months, or both. Any officer qualified to serve criminal 
process shall seize all of the fireworks mentioned herein without a warrant, and the fireworks 
seized shall, upon conviction of such violation, be forfeited to the commonwealth.